Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1417.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVII- M SUSTAINABLE AVIATION FUEL TAX CREDITSection 1701-M. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:12345678910111213141516171819202122 "ASTM." The American Society for Testing and Materials International, or its successor."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Project facility." A facility located in this Commonwealth that is owned by a qualified taxpayer that manufactures sustainable aviation fuel."Qualified taxpayer." An entity that satisfies all of the following:(1) Owns and operates a project facility . (2) Has entered into a commitment letter under section 1702-M(b) to produce sustainable aviation fuel at a project facility placed into service on or after the effective date of this section.(3) Has made a capital investment of at least $150,000,000 to construct and place into service the project facility.(4) Has created a minimum aggregate total of 400 new jobs and permanent jobs, no fewer than 50 of which are permanent jobs.(5) Has made good faith efforts to recruit and employ, and to encourage any contractors or subcontractors to recruit and employ, workers from the local labor market for employment during the construction of the project facility.(6) Has demonstrated that the new jobs created at the project facility are paid at least the prevailing minimum wage and benefit rates for each craft or classification as determined by the Department of Labor and Industry.(7) The construction work to place a project facility into service shall be performed subject to the act of March 3, 1978 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Steel Products 20260SB1417PN1874 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Procurement Act.(8) Is not a contributor to the calculation of the in-State production volume of biodiesel, biodiesel blend, diesel fuel or renewable diesel as those terms are defined in the act of July 10, 2008 (P.L.1009, No.78), known as the Biofuel Development and In-State Production Incentive Act, as of the effective date of this definition."Sustainable aviation fuel." Liquid fuel that complies with the following:(1) Can be used to fuel an aircraft.(2) Is not kerosene.(3) Is not derived from palm fatty acid distillates or petroleum, as defined under ASTM D1655-26 (2026).(4) Meets the requirements of:(i) ASTM D7566-22 (2022);(ii) the Fischer -Tropsch provisions of ASTM D1655, Annex A1 (2018); or(iii) a similar standard adopted by the department in a notice published in the Pennsylvania Bulletin."Tax credit." A tax credit authorized under this article.Section 1702-M . Eligibility. (a) Demonstration.--In order to be eligible to receive a tax credit, an entity shall demonstrate the following:(1) The entity meets the requirements of a qualified taxpayer.(2) Confirmation that the entity has filed all required State tax reports and returns for all applicable taxable years and paid any balance of State tax due as determined by assessment or determination by the department and not under timely appeal.20260SB1417PN1874 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Commitment letter.--An entity that applies for and receives a tax credit under this article shall enter into a commitment letter with the Department of Community and Economic Development to prescribe the date by which the project facility will begin to produce sustainable aviation fuel at the project facility.Section 1703-M. Application and approval of tax credit. (a) Rate.--The tax credit shall be equal to an amount not less than $1 per gallon of sustainable aviation fuel produced at a project facility by a qualified taxpayer.(b) Production incentive for feedstock source.--An additional tax credit of an amount equal to 25¢ per gallon of sustainable aviation fuel produced at a project facility by a qualified taxpayer shall be available for sustainable aviation fuel produced using feedstocks sourced from this Commonwealth or from states that are geographically contiguous to this Commonwealth.(c) Production incentive for greenhouse gas emission reduction.--An additional tax credit of an amount equal to 25¢ per gallon of sustainable aviation fuel produced at a project facility by a qualified taxpayer shall be available for sustainable aviation fuel that achieves no less than a 30% lifecycle greenhouse gas emission reduction compared to conventional jet fuel.(d) Limitation.--The amount of the tax credit approved under subsection (f) may not exceed an amount equal to $1.50 per gallon of sustainable aviation fuel produced at a project facility by a qualified taxpayer.(e) Application.--(1) A qualified taxpayer may apply to the department for 20260SB1417PN1874 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a tax credit under this section.(2) The application must be submitted to the department by March 1 for the tax credit claimed for sustainable aviation fuel produced at the project facility during the prior calendar year.(3) The application must be on a form required by the department and include the following:(i) information required by the department to document the amount of sustainable aviation fuel produced at the project facility;(ii) information required by the department to verify that the applicant is a qualified taxpayer; and(iii) any other information that the department deems appropriate to review the application. (f) Review and approval.--(1) The department shall review an application filed under subsection (e) and shall issue an approval or disapproval by May 1.(2) Upon approval, the department shall issue a certificate stating the amount of the tax credit granted for sustainable aviation fuel produced at the project facility in the prior calendar year.(g) Availability of tax credits.--(1) Each fiscal year, $30,000,000 in tax credits shall be made available to the department in accordance with this article.(2) The department shall issue up to $30,000,000 in a fiscal year to qualified taxpayers that meet the qualifications to receive a tax credit.(3) If the aggregate amount of eligible tax credit 20260SB1417PN1874 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 applications exceeds $30,000,000 in a fiscal year, the department shall issue tax credits to qualified taxpayers that meet the qualifications to receive a tax credit in amounts proportional to the applicants' relative sustainable aviation fuel certified production volumes in a fiscal year.Section 1704-M. Use of tax credits. (a) Initial use.--Prior to sale or assignment of a tax credit under section 1706-M, a qualified taxpayer must first use a tax credit against the qualified tax liability incurred in the taxable year for which the tax credit was approved.(b) Eligibility.--The tax credit may be applied against up to 20% of the qualified taxpayer's qualified tax liabilities incurred in the taxable year for which the tax credit was approved.Section 1705-M. Carryover, carryback and refund. A tax credit may not be carried back, carried forward or be used to obtain a refund.Section 1706-M. Sale or assignment. (a) Authorization.--If a qualified taxpayer holds a tax credit through the end of the calendar year in which the tax credit was granted, the qualified taxpayer may sell or assign a tax credit, in whole or in part, provided the sale is effective by the close of the following calendar year.(b) Application.--(1) To sell or assign a tax credit, a qualified taxpayer must submit an application for the sale or assignment of the tax credit with the department. The application must be on a form required by the department.(2) To approve an application, the department must receive a finding from the department that the applicant has:20260SB1417PN1874 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) filed all required State tax reports and returns for all applicable taxable years; and(ii) paid any balance of State tax due as determined by assessment or determination by the department and not under timely appeal.(c) Approval.--Upon approval by the department, the qualified taxpayer may sell or assign, in whole or in part, the tax credit.Section 1707-M. Purchasers and assignees. (a) Time.--The purchaser or assignee under section 1706-M must claim the tax credit in the calendar year in which the purchase or assignment is made.(b) Amount.--The amount of the tax credit that a purchaser or assignee under section 1706-M may use against any one qualified tax liability may not exceed 50% of any of the qualified tax liabilities of the purchaser or assignee for the taxable year.(c) Resale and assignment.--(1) A purchaser under section 1706-M may not sell or assign the purchased tax credit.(2) An assignee under section 1706-M may not sell or assign the assigned tax credit.(d) Notice.--The purchaser or assignee under section 1706-M shall notify the department of the seller or assignor of the tax credit in compliance with procedures specified by the department.Section 1708-M. Pass-through entity. (a) Election.--If a pass-through entity has an unused tax credit, the pass-through entity may elect, in writing, according to procedures established by the department, to transfer all or 20260SB1417PN1874 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a portion of the tax credit to shareholders, members or partners in proportion to the share of the entity's distributive income to which the shareholders, members or partners are entitled.(b) Limitation.--The same unused tax credit under subsection (a) may not be claimed by:(1) the pass-through entity; and(2) a shareholder, member or partner of the pass-through entity.(c) Amount.--The amount of the tax credit that a transferee under subsection (a) may use against any one qualified tax liability may not exceed 20% of qualified tax liabilities for the taxable year.(d) Time.--A transferee under subsection (a) must claim the tax credit in the calendar year in which the transfer is made.(e) Sale and assignment.--A transferee under subsection (a) may not sell or assign the tax credit.Section 1709-M. Guidelines and regulations. The department shall develop written guidelines for the implementation of this article. The guidelines shall be in effect until the department promulgates regulations for the implementation of this article.Section 1710-M. Report to General Assembly. (a) Report.--(1) No later than the year after which tax credits are first awarded under this article, and each October 1 thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the General Assembly summarizing the effectiveness of the tax credit. The report shall include the names of all qualified taxpayers utilizing the tax credit as of the date of the report and the amount of tax credits approved for, utilized 20260SB1417PN1874 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by or sold or assigned by each qualified taxpayer. The report shall be submitted to all of the following:(i) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(ii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(iii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the Senate.(iv) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the House of Representatives.(v) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Environmental Resources and Energy Committee of the Senate.(vi) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Energy Committee of the House of Representatives. (vii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Finance Committee of the Senate.(viii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Finance Committee of the House of Representatives.(2) In addition to the information required under paragraph (1), the report shall include the following information in a manner separated by geographic location within this Commonwealth:(i) The amount of tax credits claimed by qualified taxpayers during the fiscal year.(ii) The total number of new jobs and permanent jobs created by qualified taxpayers during the fiscal year, including the duration of the jobs.(b) Public information.--Notwithstanding any law providing for the confidentiality of tax records, the information in the 20260SB1417PN1874 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 report under subsection (a) shall be public information, and all report information shall be posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1417PN1874 - 10 - 1234